North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11.2 Foster Care Parent Grievance [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2021, ch. 353, § 24, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11.2-01.
Foster care parent grievance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 526, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 111, effective January 1, 2020; repealed by 2021, ch. 353, § 24, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11.2-02.
Grievance procedure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 526, § 2; 2019, ch. 391, § 112, effective January 1, 2020; repealed by 2021, ch. 353, § 24, effective August 1, 2021.